Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 7. Harbor Facility Grant Program.

Sec. 29.60.800.
Harbor facility grant fund.

There is established the harbor facility grant fund consisting of money appropriated to the fund. Each fiscal year, the legislature may appropriate money to the fund from the watercraft fuel tax account (AS

43.40.010(f)

) and from the fisheries business tax collected under AS

43.75.015

after payments to municipalities are made under AS

43.75.130

. The legislature may make other appropriations to the fund. The legislature may appropriate to the fund income earned on money in the fund.

Money appropriated to the harbor facility grant fund may be expended by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for harbor facility grants without further appropriation. Money in the fund does not lapse and remains available for expenditure in successive fiscal years.

Each fiscal year, the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall use an amount equal to at least 50 percent of the balance of the harbor facility grant fund on June 30 of the preceding fiscal year for harbor facility grants.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 6 SLA 2012)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, deleted “municipal” preceding “harbor facility” throughout the section.

Sec. 29.60.810.
Grant applications.

A municipality or regional housing authority that owns a harbor facility may submit to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities an application for a harbor facility grant to be used for construction, expansion, major repair, or major maintenance of a harbor facility. The application must include information about the project requested by the department. For a proposed project to be eligible for a grant, the municipality or regional housing authority must provide evidence acceptable to the department that the

proposed project is a capital improvement project and not part of a preventive maintenance program or regular custodial care program;

municipality or regional housing authority will provide 50 percent of the total project cost as matching funds for the state grant and that money received by the municipality or regional housing authority from the state will not be used for the matching funds except money received under

AS

29.60.850

—

29.60.879

(community assistance program);

AS

29.60.450

, AS

43.75.130

, and

43.75.137

(shared fisheries business taxes);

AS

43.52.200

—

43.52.295

(excise tax on overnight accommodations on commercial passenger vessels); and

a transfer agreement between the state and a municipality for a sale under AS

35.10.120

;

municipality or regional housing authority has secured and will maintain adequate property loss insurance for the replacement cost of the harbor facility or has an adequate program of insurance;

municipality or regional housing authority has a preventive maintenance plan for the harbor facility and will be adequately adhering to the preventive maintenance plan after completion of the proposed project.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 12 SLA 2008; am § 6 ch 7 SLA 2011; am § 4 ch 44 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 7, 2011, inserted “or regional housing authority” following “municipality” throughout the section and added (2)(C) and (2)(D) and made a related change.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, substituted “community assistance program” for “community revenue sharing program” in (2)(A) and substituted “municipality for” for “municipality pursuant to” in (2)(D).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 17, ch. 7, SLA 2011, the amendment of (2)(D) of this section made by § 6, ch. 7, SLA 2011, is retroactive to January 1, 1993.

Sec. 29.60.820.
Award of grants.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may award a harbor facility grant during a fiscal year only for a proposed project eligible under AS

29.60.810

based on a grant application filed during the immediately preceding fiscal year before February 1. The total amount of grant money made available to a municipality or regional housing authority during a fiscal year may not exceed $5,000,000.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall award a grant for every proposed project eligible under AS

29.60.810

that is for repair and major maintenance of a harbor facility that was transferred by the state to a municipality or regional housing authority before grants may be made for other proposed harbor facility projects during a fiscal year. However, after the department makes a grant for the repair and major maintenance of a harbor facility under this subsection, no other grants for the repair and major maintenance of that facility may be made during the same or any other fiscal year.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall establish priorities for the award of grants for proposed harbor facility projects under (b) of this section and priorities for the award of grants for other proposed harbor facility projects, with new construction projects having the lowest priority. The department shall award grants in the order of priority established. In establishing priorities, the department shall include at least the following, in the order listed:

the extent to which the municipality or regional housing authority can demonstrate that it will have sufficient revenue to operate and maintain the harbor facility in the future without state aid;

public safety and emergency factors;

the amount spent by the municipality or regional housing authority on maintenance of the harbor facility;

other options that would reduce or eliminate the need for the proposed project; and

whether alternative harbor projects would better serve the public interest.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities may suggest modifications to a project request to achieve cost savings or to better serve the public interest and, if the municipality or regional housing authority agrees, award the harbor facility grant for the proposed project as modified.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 2006; am § 7 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective May 7, 2011, inserted “or regional housing authority” following “municipality” throughout the section and deleted “municipal” preceding “harbor” in the first sentences in (a) and (c) and near the end of (d).

Sec. 29.60.830.
Definition.

In AS

29.60.800

—

29.60.830

, “regional housing authority” means a regional housing authority established under AS

18.55.996

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 7 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 19, ch. 7, SLA 2011 makes this section effective May 7, 2011, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.